Utah statutes.
31A-2-107.   Bonding of employees.
The commissioner shall procure a blanket bond covering the commissioner, his
appointees, and each employee of the Insurance Department.  This bond shall
satisfy the requirements of the Department of Administrative Services.  The
commissioner may procure this blanket bond through the state risk manager.
The state risk manager may obtain the bond from an authorized insurer or may
place the risk with the state Risk Management Fund.
